Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-46] Co-mortgagor. For purposes
of qualifying for a mortgage loan to finance the purchase of a dwelling unit
under this part, a "qualified resident" as defined in section 201H‑32
may be assisted by a co-mortgagor who is a family member as defined by the
corporation, who may own other lands in fee simple or leasehold suitable for
dwelling purposes, whose interest in the dwelling unit to be purchased is
limited to no more than one per cent, and who certifies that the co-mortgagor
does not intend to reside in the dwelling unit. The income and assets of the
co-mortgagor shall not be counted in determining the eligibility of the
"qualified resident" under this chapter. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next